Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-902
Building zones; regulations; uniformity; manufactured homes; certain codes excepted.

(1) For any or all of the purposes designated in section 19-901, the city council or village board may divide the municipality into districts of such number, shape, and area as may be deemed best suited to carry out the purposes of sections 19-901 to 19-914 and may regulate and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, or use of buildings, structures, or land within the districts. All such regulations shall be uniform for each class or kind of buildings throughout each district, but the regulations applicable to one district may differ from those applicable to other districts. If a regulation affects the Niobrara scenic river corridor as defined in section 72-2006 and is not incorporated within the boundaries of the municipality, the Niobrara Council shall act on the regulation as provided in section 72-2010.

(2)(a) The city council or village board shall not adopt or enforce any zoning ordinance or regulation which prohibits the use of land for a proposed residential structure for the sole reason that the proposed structure is a manufactured home if such manufactured home bears an appropriate seal which indicates that it was constructed in accordance with the standards of the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles, the Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular Housing Units Act, or the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. The city council or village board may require that a manufactured home be located and installed according to the same standards for foundation system, permanent utility connections, setback, and minimum square footage which would apply to a site-built, single-family dwelling on the same lot. The city council or village board may also require that manufactured homes meet the following standards:

(i) The home shall have no less than nine hundred square feet of floor area;

(ii) The home shall have no less than an eighteen-foot exterior width;

(iii) The roof shall be pitched with a minimum vertical rise of two and one-half inches for each twelve inches of horizontal run;

(iv) The exterior material shall be of a color, material, and scale comparable with those existing in residential site-built, single-family construction;

(v) The home shall have a nonreflective roof material which is or simulates asphalt or wood shingles, tile, or rock; and

(vi) The home shall have wheels, axles, transporting lights, and removable towing apparatus removed.

(b) The city council or village board may not require additional standards unless such standards are uniformly applied to all single-family dwellings in the zoning district.

(c) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to supersede any valid restrictive covenants of record.

(3) For purposes of this section, manufactured home shall mean (a) a factory-built structure which is to be used as a place for human habitation, which is not constructed or equipped with a permanent hitch or other device allowing it to be moved other than to a permanent site, which does not have permanently attached to its body or frame any wheels or axles, and which bears a label certifying that it was built in compliance with National Manufactured Home Construction and Safety Standards, 24 C.F.R. 3280 et seq., promulgated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, or (b) a modular housing unit as defined in section 71-1557 bearing a seal in accordance with the Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular Housing Units Act.

(4) Subdivision regulations and building, plumbing, electrical, housing, fire, or health codes or similar regulations and the adoption thereof shall not be subject to sections 19-901 to 19-915.

Laws 1927, c. 43, § 2, p. 183;

C.S.1929, § 19-902;

R.S.1943, § 19-902;

Laws 1975, LB 410, § 11;

Laws 1981, LB 298, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 511, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 56;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1234, § 9.

Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular Housing Units Act, see section 71-1555.

Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles, see section 71-4601.